Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 8

Federal Elections

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 310, § 3: Mar. 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas Code §7-8-102 is in conflict with Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 29; that the inconsistency creates the risk of ambiguity and uncertainty of the process to follow if a vacancy in the office of United States Senator arises; and that this act should become effective as soon as possible to clarify the process for filling a vacancy in the office of United States Senator. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

7-8-101. Primaries — General law governs.

All primaries, preferential and general, for the selection of nominees for federal offices, including those of the United States Senators and United States Representatives, shall be held on the same date and in the same manner as the preferential and general primaries for state, district, county, and township offices and shall be governed by the same procedure prescribed by this act.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 3, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-301; Acts 2007, No. 987, § 3; 2009, No. 26, § 3; 2009, No. 375, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment added the (a) designation and added (b).

The 2009 amendment by acts Nos. 26 and 375 each deleted (b).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1969, No. 465, codified as §§7-1-101,7-1-103 —7-1-105,7-3-101 —7-3-108,7-4-101 —7-4-105,7-4-107 —7-4-112,7-5-101,7-5-102,
7-5-103 [repealed],7-5-202 —7-5-209,7-5-210 [repealed],7-5-211,7-5-301,7-5-302 [repealed],7-5-303 [repealed],7-5-304 —7-5-306,7-5-307 [repealed],7-5-308,7-5-309,7-5-312,7-5-313 [repealed],7-5-314 —7-5-319,7-5-401 —7-5-403,7-5-405 —7-5-417,7-5-501 [repealed],7-5-502 —7-5-504,7-5-505 [repealed],7-5-506 [repealed],7-5-507,7-5-508 [repealed],7-5-509,7-5-511 [repealed],7-5-512,7-5-513,7-5-514 [repealed],7-5-515 —7-5-518,7-5-519 [repealed],7-5-520 —7-5-522,7-5-524 —7-5-531,7-5-701 —7-5-706,7-5-801 —7-5-809,7-6-101 —7-6-105,7-7-101 —7-7-105,7-7-201 —7-7-203,7-7-301 —7-7-307,7-7-309,7-7-310 [repealed],7-7-401,7-7-402,7-7-403 [repealed],7-8-101 —7-8-104,7-8-301,7-8-302,7-8-304 —7-8-307,25-16-801.

7-8-102. Filling Senate vacancies.

(a)

Vacancies in the office of United States Senator shall be filled by appointment by the Governor.

(b)(1)

The appointee under subsection (a) of this section shall serve during the entire unexpired Senate term if the office would in regular course be filled at the next general election if no vacancy had occurred.

(2)(A)

If the office would not in regular course be filled at the next general election, the remaining portion of the vacated term shall be filled as follows:

(i)

At the next general election if the vacancy occurs four (4) months or more before the next general election; or

(ii)

At the second general election after the vacancy occurs if the vacancy occurs less than four (4) months before the next general election.

(B)

The person so elected shall:

(i)

Take office on the first day of January following his or her election; and

(ii)

Serve the remaining portion of the vacated term.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 3, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-302; Acts 2005, No. 2145, § 14; 2007, No. 1049, § 29; 2009, No. 1480, § 45; 2017, No. 310, §
2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 310, § 1, provided: “The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

Arkansas Code §7-8-102 in its current form directly conflicts with Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 29, regarding the method of filling vacancies in the representation of the State of Arkansas in the United States Senate;

“(2)

The conflicting provisions of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 29, and §7-8-102 create the potential for ambiguity and uncertainty in the event a United States Senate vacancy occurs; and

“(3)

It is the intent of this act to provide consistency between the Arkansas Constitution and the Arkansas Code by providing that:

“(A)

Vacancies in the office of United States Senator shall be filled by appointment of the Governor; and

“(B)

The appointee shall serve until the office is filled at a general election.”

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment rewrote (b).

The 2009 amendment substituted “§7-11-101 et seq.”
for “§7-5-103(b)” in (b).

The 2017 amendment rewrote the section.

7-8-103. Credentials of Senate appointee.

When the Governor shall make a temporary appointment of a United States Senator by authority of this subchapter, he or she shall deliver to the senator a credential in the following form:

“
who was chosen United States Senator of the State of Arkansas, in pursuance of the Constitution of the United States of America, having died (resigned, or otherwise, as the case may be): Therefore, I,
, Governor of the State of Arkansas, have appointed
United States Senator to fill the said vacancy temporarily until the election of a United States Senator by the qualified electors of the state. Given under my hand and the seal of the said state this
day of
, 20 Governor of the State of Arkansas Attest: , Secretary of State”.

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 3, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-303; Acts 2005, No. 67, § 22.

7-8-104. Filling vacancies in the House of Representatives.

When any vacancy shall happen in the office of a member of the United States House of Representatives from this state by death, resignation, removal, or otherwise, it shall be the duty of the Governor, by proclamation, to order the sheriffs of the several counties to order an election to be held on a certain day to be named in the proclamation to fill the vacancy. The election shall be conducted in the same manner, and returns thereof made, as prescribed in this title for general elections.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 3, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-304; Acts 1987, No. 248, § 3.

Subchapter 2

— Selection of Delegates for National Convention

Publisher's Notes.

Former subchapter 2, as enacted by Acts 1985, No. 566, and which concerned the selection of delegates for national conventions, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 123, § 16. That subchapter was derived from the following sources:

7-8-201. Acts 1985, No. 566, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-205.13.

7-8-202. Acts 1985, No. 566, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-205.14.

7-8-203. Acts 1985, No. 566, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-205.15.

7-8-204. Acts 1985, No. 566, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-205.16.

Former subchapter 2 as enacted by Acts 1987, No. 123 and which also concerned the selection of delegates for national conventions, was repealed by Acts 1989, No. 700, § 1. That subchapter was derived from the following sources:

7-8-201. Acts 1987, No. 123, § 1.

7-8-202. Acts 1987, No. 123, § 2.

7-8-203. Acts 1987, No. 123, § 3.

7-8-204. Acts 1987, No. 123, § 4; 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 28, § 1.

7-8-205. Acts 1987, No. 123, § 5; 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 28, § 2.

7-8-206. Acts 1987, No. 123, § 6; 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 28, § 3.

7-8-207. Acts 1987, No. 123, § 7; 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 28, § 4.

7-8-208. Acts 1987, No. 123, § 8.

7-8-209. Acts 1987, No. 123, § 9; 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 28, § 5.

7-8-210. Acts 1987, No. 123, § 10.

7-8-211. Acts 1987, No. 123, § 11.

7-8-201. Preferential elections required — Apportionment of delegates.

Each political party in the state desiring to select delegates to attend a quadrennial national nominating convention of the party to select a nominee for the office of President of the United States shall hold a preferential primary election in the state, and the delegates to the national party convention shall be apportioned to the presidential candidates whose names were on the ballot at the preferential primary or to “uncommitted” in the proportion that the votes cast for each candidate or for “uncommitted” bear to the total votes cast at the election, rounded to the closest whole number.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 700, § 2; 1997, No. 450, § 1; 2005, No. 501, § 1; 2007, No. 987, § 4; 2009, No. 26, § 4; 2009, No. 375, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment redesignated former (a)(3)(A) as present (a)(3)(A)(i); added (a)(3)(A)(ii) and (a)(3)(A)(iii); deleted former (a)(3)(B)(iv) and made a minor punctuation and stylistic change; added (a)(3)(C) and (a)(3)(D); deleted former (a)(5)(A) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and deleted “under the direction of the state board” following “commissioners” in present (a)(5)(A).

The 2009 amendment by acts Nos. 26 and 375 each deleted all the text of the section except (a)(1), removed the subsection designation, and deleted “presidential” preceding “preferential primary” in two places.

7-8-202, 7-8-203. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning the date of the primary and payment of election expenses, were repealed by Acts 1997, No. 450, §§ 2 and 3. They were derived from the following sources:

7-8-202. Acts 1989, No. 700, § 2.

7-8-203. Acts 1989, No. 700, § 2.

7-8-204. Rules for selection of delegates and alternates.

Each political party holding a preferential primary election in the state shall adopt appropriate rules for the selection of delegates and alternate delegates to the quadrennial national nominating convention of the party and to otherwise carry out the intent and purposes of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 700, § 2; 1997, No. 450, § 4; 2005, No. 501, § 2; 2009, No. 26, § 5; 2009, No. 375, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by acts Nos. 26 and 375 each deleted “presidential” preceding “preferential primary election.”

7-8-205 — 7-8-211. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

As to repeal of former §§7-8-205 —7-8-211, see Publisher's Note to this subchapter.

Subchapter 3

— Presidential Electors

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 38, § 3: Feb. 16, 1972. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the 1971 Regular Session of the General Assembly enacted legislation to permit a person's name to be printed on the ballot as a candidate for President or Vice-President and for some other office at the same election but that subsequent legislation enacted at the same session inadvertently removed the provisions from the earlier act which permitted the same, and that this act should be given effect immediately in order to correct this situation in advance of the 1972 elections. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2011, No. 1185, §
21: Oct. 2, 2011.

7-8-301. Date of election.

(a)

There shall be elected by general ticket in the manner and with the effect provided in this subchapter, on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November preceding the expiration of the term of office of each President of the United States, as many electors of President of the United States and Vice President of the United States as this state may be entitled to elect.

(b)

If the United States Congress should hereafter fix a different day for the election, then the election for electors shall be held on the day as shall be named by act of the United States Congress.

(c)

The election shall be conducted and returns thereof made as provided in §7-8-302.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 2, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-206.

7-8-302. Election and certification of electors — Ballots — Contesting conventions — Vacancy.

Choosing and election of electors of President of the United States and Vice President of the United States shall be in the following manner:

(1)(A)

In each year in which a President and Vice President are chosen, each political party or group in the state shall choose by its state convention electors of President and Vice President. The state convention of the party or group shall also choose electors at large if any are to be appointed for the state.

(B)

The state convention of the party or group, by its chair and secretary, shall certify to the Secretary of State the total list of electors together with electors at large so chosen. The certificate shall be filed no later than September 15 in the year of the election. The filing of the certificate with the Secretary of State shall be deemed and taken to be the choosing and selection of the electors of this state, if the party or group is successful at the polls, as provided in this subchapter, in choosing their candidates for President and Vice President.

(C)

The certification by the respective political parties or groups in this state of electors of President and Vice President shall be made to the Secretary of State within two (2) days after the state convention;

(2)(A)

Should more than one (1) certificate of choice and selection of electors of the same political party or group be filed by contesting conventions or contesting groups, it shall be the duty of the constitutional officers of this state within ten (10) days after the adjournment of the last of the conventions to meet in the office of the Governor and determine which set of nominees for electors of the party or group was chosen and selected by the authorized convention of the party or group.

(B)

The Secretary of State shall notify the state officers of the date, time, and place of the meeting.

(C)(i)

At the meeting, a majority of the officers present, after notice to the chair and secretaries or managers of the conventions or groups and after a hearing, shall determine which set of electors was chosen by the authorized convention and shall so announce and publish that fact.

(ii)

The decision shall be final, and the set of electors determined by the state officers to be chosen shall be the list or set of electors to be deemed elected if that party is successful at the polls, as herein provided;

(3)

Should a vacancy occur in the choice of an elector, the vacancy may be filled by the state executive committee of the party or group, to be certified by the committee to the Secretary of State;

(4)(A)

The names of the candidates of the several political parties or groups for electors of President and Vice President shall not be printed on the official ballot to be voted on in the election to be held on the day provided in §7-8-301. In lieu of the names of the candidates for electors, the name of the candidate for President and the name of the candidate for Vice President with the particular political party designation of each shall be printed on the ballot. Each voter in this state may choose and elect one (1) list or set of electors from the several lists or sets of electors chosen and selected by the respective political parties or groups, by placing an appropriate mark on the ballot.

(B)

Placing a cross within the square before the bracket enclosing the names of President and Vice President shall not be deemed and taken as a direct vote for the candidates for President and Vice President, or either of them, but shall only be deemed and taken to be a vote for the entire list or set of electors chosen by the political party or group so certified to the Secretary of State as herein provided. Voting by means of placing a cross in the appropriate place following the names of the candidates for President and Vice President shall not be deemed or taken as a direct vote for the candidates for President and Vice President, or either of them, but instead, as to the presidential vote, as a vote for the entire list or set of electors chosen by that political party or group so certified to the Secretary of State as herein provided;

(5)(A)(i)

In order to have the name of a political party's candidates for President and Vice President printed on the ballot, a political party shall hold a presidential preferential primary election.

(ii)

A new political party formed under the petition process may nominate by convention if the presidential election is the first general election after certification as a party by the Secretary of State.

(B)

A political group desiring to have the names of its candidates for President and Vice President printed on the ballot shall file a petition with the Secretary of State by noon on the first Monday of August of the year of the election. The petition shall contain at the time of filing the names of one thousand (1,000) qualified electors of the state declaring their desire to have printed on the ballot the names of their candidate for President and Vice President. The Secretary of State shall verify the sufficiency of the petition within ten (10) days from the filing of the petition. If the petition is determined to be insufficient, the Secretary of State shall notify in writing the political group through its designated agent and shall set forth his or her reasons for so finding.

(C)

Any challenges to the certification of the Secretary of State shall be filed in the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

(D)

No later than 12:00 noon on the seventy-fifth day before the election, a political group that qualifies by petition to place its candidate on the ballot shall submit a certificate of choice stating the names of its candidates for President and Vice President, signed under oath by either the chair, vice chair, or secretary of the political group's convention; and

(6)(A)

Persons desiring to have their names printed on the ballot as independent candidates for President and Vice President shall file a petition with the Secretary of State by noon on the first Monday of August of the year of the election. The petition shall contain at the time of filing the names of one thousand (1,000) qualified electors of the state declaring their desire to have printed on the ballot the names of the persons desiring their names to be printed on the ballot as independent candidates for President and Vice President. The Secretary of State shall verify the sufficiency of the petition within ten (10) days from the filing of the petition. If the petition is determined to be insufficient, the Secretary of State shall notify in writing the persons desiring to have their names printed on the ballot as independent candidates for President and Vice President at the address or telephone number submitted with the petition and shall set forth his or her reasons for so finding.

(B)

Any challenges to the certification of the Secretary of State shall be filed in the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

(C)

By September 15 in the year of the election, independent candidates who qualify by petition to be on the ballot shall certify to the Secretary of State the total list of electors together with electors at large. The filing of the certificate with the Secretary of State shall be deemed and taken to be the choice and selection of the electors of this state, if the independent candidate is successful at the polls, as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 2, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-207; Acts 1991, No. 242, § 1; 1997, No. 450, § 5; 2001, No. 473, § 1; 2005, No. 501, § 3; 2007, No. 822, §§ 1, 2; 2009, No. 26, § 6; 2009, No. 375, § 7; 2009, No. 959, §§ 42, 43; 2011, No. 1185, § 12.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment, in (5), inserted “of the year of the election” in (B), deleted the last sentence in (B) and deleted former (B)(i) through (iii), deleted former (C) and redesignated the following subdivisions accordingly, and substituted “September 1” for “September 15” in present (D); and added (6).

The 2009 amendment by acts Nos. 26 and 375 each deleted “presidential” preceding “preferential primary election” in (5)(A)(i),

The 2009 amendment by No. 959 made a minor stylistic change in (5)(A)(ii); substituted “No later than seventy (70) days before” for “By September 1 in the year of” in (5)(D); deleted (5)(E); and substituted “September 15” for “September 1” in (6)(C).

The 2011 amendment substituted “12:00 noon on the seventy-fifth day” for “seventy (70) days” in (5)(D).

7-8-303. Right of nominee to be candidate for other office.

(a)

The appearance on the general election ballot of the name of a party nominee for the office of President of the United States or Vice President of the United States in lieu of the names of the candidates for electors for the offices shall not limit or restrict the party nominee so named from being a candidate in his or her own right for any office to be filled at the general election.

(b)

A person may be a candidate for President of the United States or Vice President of the United States and for the United States Senate or United States House of Representatives in the same primary and general election.

History.

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 38, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-207.1; Acts 2015, No. 742, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment designated the existing language as (a); and added (b).

7-8-304. Delivery and canvass of returns — Tie vote.

(a)

The county clerks of the several counties shall make, within eight (8) days next after holding the election as provided in §7-8-302, three (3) copies of the abstract of the votes cast for electors by each political party or group as indicated by the voter as provided in §7-8-302 by a cross in the square to the right of the bracket as specified in § 7-8-302 and transmit by mail one (1) of the copies to the Governor, transmit another to the office of the Secretary of State, and retain the third in his or her office to be sent for by the Governor in case both the others should be mislaid.

(b)

Within twenty (20) days after the holding of the election, and sooner if all the returns are received by either the Governor or by the Secretary of State, the constitutional officers of this state, or any two (2) of them, shall proceed, in the presence of the Governor, to open and canvass the election returns and to declare which set of candidates for President of the United States and Vice President of the United States received the highest number of votes so cast, and the candidates' party's electors shall be taken and deemed to be elected as electors of President and Vice President.

(c)

Should two (2) or more sets of candidates for President and Vice President be returned with an equal and the highest vote, the Secretary of State shall cause a notice to be published, which notice shall name some day and place not less than five (5) days from the time of the publication of the notice upon which the constitutional officers of this state will decide by lot which of the sets of candidates for President and Vice President so equal and highest shall be declared to be highest. Upon the day and at the place so appointed in the notice, the constitutional officers shall so decide by lot and declare which is deemed highest of the sets of candidates for President and Vice President so equal and highest, thereby determining only that the electors chosen as provided in this subchapter by the candidates' party or group are thereby elected by general ticket to be the electors.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 2, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-208.

7-8-305. Publication of results — Certification of election.

Within five (5) days after the votes shall have been canvassed and the results declared or the result declared by lot as provided in §7-8-304, the Governor shall:

(1)

Cause the result of the election to be published;

(2)

Proclaim the persons composing the list so elected to be the electors of President of the United States and Vice President of the United States by mailing the electors a triplicate certificate of their appointment under the Seal of the State of Arkansas; and

(3)

Transmit under the Seal of the State of Arkansas to the United States Secretary of State the certificate of the election of the electors as required by the laws of the United States Congress.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 2, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-209; Acts 2013, No. 1126, § 15.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “Seal of the State of Arkansas” for “seal of the state” in (2).

7-8-306. Voting by electors — Expenses.

(a)

The electors, elected as provided in this subchapter, shall meet at the office of the Secretary of State, in a room to be designated by him or her in the State Capitol Building, at the time appointed by the laws of the United States at the hour of 10:00 a.m. of that day, and give their votes for President of the United States and for Vice President of the United States, in the manner provided in this subchapter, and perform such duties as are or may be required by law.

(b)(1)(A)

Each elector shall serve without pay, but he or she is eligible for reimbursement by the Secretary of State for reasonable and necessary expenses to attend a meeting under subsection (a) of this section.

(B)

An elector who is reimbursed for expenses under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall be reimbursed at the same rate prescribed for a state employee.

(2)

Any person appointed by the electors assembled to fill a vacancy shall also receive the compensation provided for electors appointed.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 2, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-210; Acts 2017, No. 578, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “provided in this subchapter” for “herein provided” in (a); and rewrote (b).

7-8-307. Vacancy — Appointment — Exception.

In case any person duly elected an elector of President of the United States and Vice President of the United States shall fail to attend at the United States Capitol on the day on which his or her vote is required to be given, it shall be the duty of the electors of President and Vice President attending at the time and place to appoint persons to fill the vacancies. Should the person or persons chosen pursuant to this subchapter arrive at the place aforesaid before the votes for President and Vice President are actually given, the person or persons appointed to fill the vacancy shall not act as an elector of President and Vice President.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 2, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-211.

Subchapter 4

— Special Residency and Age Requirements

7-8-401 — 7-8-405. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was repealed by identical Acts 1995, Nos. 928 and 936, § 1. The sections were derived from the following sources:

7-8-401. Acts 1971, No. 37, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-212.

7-8-402. Acts 1971, No. 37, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-213.

7-8-403. Acts 1971, No. 37, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-215.

7-8-404. Acts 1971, No. 37, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-214.

7-8-405. Acts 1971, No. 37, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-216.